District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0607.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
36 act may be cited as the "Supporting Local Business Enterprises Emergency Amendment Act of
37 2026".

38 Sec. 2. The Small and Certified Business Enterprise Development and Assistance Act of
39 2005, effective October 20, 2005 (D.C. Law 16-33; D.C. Official Code § 2-218.01 et seq.), is
40 amended as follows:
41 (a) The table of contents is amended as follows:
42 (1) The section designation for section 2315 is amended to read as follows:
43 “Sec. 2315. Living Wage Certification Program. [Repealed]”.
44 (2) The section designation for section 2337 is amended to read as follows:
45 “Sec. 2337. Local business enterprise with its principal office located in an enterprise
46 zone.”.
47 (3) The section designation for section 2346 is amended to read as follows:
48 “Sec. 2346. Performance and subcontracting requirements for government-assisted
49 projects; subcontracting plans.”.
50 (4) A new section designation is added to read as follows:
51 “Sec. 2361a. Certificate of registration during a public health emergency.”.
52 (5) The section designation for section 2367 is amended to read as follows:
53 “Sec. 2367. Establishment of the Volunteer Corp of Executives and Entrepreneurs.
54 [Repealed]”.
55 (6) The section designation for section 2371 is amended to read as follows:
56 “Sec. 2371. Triennial review of program and subchapter. [Repealed]”.
57 (b) Section 2302 (D.C. Official Code § 2-218.02) is amended as follows:
58 (1) Paragraph (1B) is amended to read as follows:
59 “(1B) “Beneficiary” means a business enterprise, not-for-profit business, or other
60 person that is the prime contractor or developer on a government-assisted project.”.
2

61 (2) Paragraph (7) is amended to read as follows:
62 “(7) “Economically disadvantaged individual” means an individual who owns at
63 least a 51% interest in a business enterprise and whose personal net worth does not exceed the
64 limit set forth in 49 CFR § 26.68.”.
65 (3) Paragraph (8) is amended to read as follows:
66 “(8) “Enterprise zone” means a census tract(s) within the District of Columbia
67 that has a poverty rate of 10 percent or more as provided by the U.S. Census Bureau.”.
68 (4) Paragraph (8A) is amended to read as follows:
69 “(8A) “Equity impact enterprise” means a business enterprise that is a resident-
70 owned business, small business enterprise, and disadvantaged business enterprise.”.
71 (5) A new paragraph (8B) is added to read as follows:
72 “(8B) “Equity sponsor” means a small investor, a disadvantaged investor, or a
73 certified equity participant.”.
74 (6) A new paragraph (9-1) is added to read as follows:
75 “(9-1) “Formal complaint” means a complaint that is submitted to the
76 Department in writing, sworn to by the complainant, and notarized.”.
77 (7) A new paragraph (10A) is added to read as follows:
78 “(10A) “Informal complaint” means any complaint other than a formal complaint,
79 and includes complaints submitted in person, by email, by telephone, or through the
80 Department’s complaint hotline.”.
81 (8) A new paragraph (10B) is added to read as follows:
82 “(10B) “Independently owned and operated” means, with respect to a business,
83 that the ownership interests, management, and operation of the business are not subject to
3

84 control, restriction, modification, or limitation by a person with no official role in the business.
85 There is a rebuttable presumption that a business is not independently owned and operated if:
86 “(A) A person with no official role in the business owns or controls 50%
87 or more of the voting stock; or
88 “(B) One or more owners, general partners, directors, officers, or members
89 of another business controls or has the power to control or has the ability to control, veto,
90 approve, deny, amend or change the course of the day-to-day operations of the business, the
91 business’s board of directors, or owner of the business.”.
92 (9) Paragraph (11) is amended to read as follows:
93 “(11) “Joint venture” means 2 or more persons that combine their property,
94 capital, efforts, skills, or knowledge to carry out a single project.”.
95 (10) Paragraph (13A) is amended to read as follows:
96 “(13A) “Material change” means a change in:
97 “(A) A business’s ownership;
98 “(B) The address of a business’s principal office;
99 “(C) A business’s size, if the business is certified as a small business
100 enterprise; and
101 “(D) Any other characteristic of the business that affects whether the
102 business continues to qualify for certification under a CBE category under which the business
103 enterprise is certified.”.
104 (11) Paragraph (13B) is redesignated as paragraph (13D).
105 (12) New paragraphs (13B) and (13C) are added to read as follows:
4

106 “(13B) “Person” means any individual, firm, partnership, general partner of a
107 partnership, limited liability company, registered limited liability partnership, foreign limited
108 liability partnership, association, corporation, unincorporated business, company, syndicate,
109 estate, trust, business trust, trustee, trustee in bankruptcy, receiver, executor, administrator,
110 assignee, fiduciary, or entity of any kind.
111 “(13C) “Principal office” means the location where the primary operational,
112 financial, and recordkeeping functions of the business occur.”.
113 (13) Paragraph (15) is amended to read as follows:
114 “(15) "Resident-owned business" means a local business enterprise in which more
115 than 50% of the ownership interest is owned by an individual who is, or individuals who are:
116 “(A) Domiciled in the District of Columbia; and
117 “(B) Subject to personal income tax under District law as a full-year
118 resident, or as full-year residents, of the District of Columbia.”.
119 (c) Section 2315 (D.C. Official Code § 2-218.15) is repealed.
120 (d) Section 2331 (D.C. Official Code § 2-218.31) is amended by adding a new paragraph
121 (1A) to read as follows:
122 “(1A)(A) Is:
123 “(i) Independently owned and operated;
124 “(ii) More than 50% owned, operated, and controlled by a District-
125 based enterprise or not-for-profit business; or
126 “(iii) Owned by a non-District-based business enterprise that is
127 more than 50% owned by District residents;”.
128 (e) Section 2332 (D.C. Official Code § 2-218.32) is amended as follows:
5

129 (1) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
130 (A) Paragraph (1)(A) is amended by striking the semicolon and inserting
131 the phrase “; and” in its place.
132 (B) Paragraph (2) is repealed.
133 (2) Subsections (b) and (c) are repealed.
134 (f) Section 2333 (D.C. Official Code § 2-218.33) is amended as follows:
135 (1) Subsection (a)(2)(A) is amended by striking the phrase “; or” and inserting a
136 period in its place.
137 (2) Subsection (b) is repealed.
138 (g) Section 2337 (D.C. Official Code § 2–218.37) is amended to read as follows:
139 “Sec. 2337. Local business enterprise with its principal office located in an enterprise
140 zone.
141 “A local business enterprise shall be eligible for certification as a local business
142 enterprise with its principal office located in an enterprise zone if its principal office is located in
143 an enterprise zone as defined by section 2302(8).”.
144 (h) Section 2338 (D.C. Official Code § 2-218.38) is amended as follows:
145 (1) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the semicolon and inserting the phrase “;
146 and” in its place.
147 (2) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a period
148 in its place.
149 (3) Paragraph (4) is repealed.
150 (i) Section 2346 (D.C. Official Code § 2-218.46) is amended as follows:
6

151 (1) The section heading is amended by striking the phrase “construction and non-
152 construction contracts” and inserting the phrase “government-assisted projects” in its place.
153 (2) Subsection (a)(3) is amended to read as follows:
154 “(3) A local business enterprise shall not be subject to the requirements in
155 paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection.”.
156 (3) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
157 (A) Paragraph (1)(A) is amended to read as follows:
158 “(A)(i) This paragraph applies to each contract for a government-assisted
159 project for which a certified business enterprise was selected as a beneficiary and was:
160 “(I) Granted points or a price reduction pursuant to section
161 2343; or
162 “(II) Selected through a set-aside program under this
163 subpart.
164 “(ii) If the contract for the government-assisted project is valued at
165 or over $1 million:
166 “(I) The certified business enterprise shall perform at least
167 35% of the work on the contract with its own organization and resources; and
168 “(II) If the certified business enterprise subcontracts, at
169 least 35% of the dollar volume of the overall subcontract shall be subcontracted with certified
170 business enterprises.
171 “(iii) If the project is valued at less than $1 million:
172 “(I) The certified business enterprise shall perform at least
173 50% of the work on the contract with its own organization and resources; and
7

174 “(II) If the certified business enterprise subcontracts, at
175 least 35% of the dollar volume of the overall subcontracting amount shall be subcontracted with
176 certified business enterprises.”.
177 (B) Paragraph (2)(A) is amended to read as follows:
178 “(A) For each government-assisted project for which a certified joint
179 venture is selected as a beneficiary and is granted points or a price reduction pursuant to section
180 2343, selected through a set-aside program under this part, or conferred a procurement
181 preference for being a certified business enterprise:
182 “(i) Each certified business enterprise holding a majority or
183 minority interest in the certified joint venture shall, with its own organization and resources,
184 perform a percentage of the work equal to or greater than its percentage interest in the joint
185 venture.
186 “(ii) If the certified joint venture subcontracts, at least 35% of the
187 dollar volume of the subcontract shall be subcontracted with qualified certified business
188 enterprises.”.
189 (4) Subsection (b-1) is amended by striking the phrase “subsections (a) and (b) of
190 this subsection” and inserting the phrase “subsections (a) and (b) of this section” in its place.
191 (5) Subsection (c) is repealed.
192 (6) A new subsection (c-1) is added to read as follows:
193 “(c-1) Any dollar volume of a contract for a government-assisted project that is
194 subcontracted to a certified business enterprise in which a beneficiary of that contract has an
195 ownership or financial interest shall not count toward the fulfillment of the 35% dollar volume
196 subcontracting requirement set forth in this section.”.
8

197 (7) Subsection (d)(3) is amended by striking the word “District” and inserting the
198 phrase “procurement authority” in its place.
199 (8) Subsection (h) is repealed.
200 (9) Subsection (i) is amended as follows:
201 (A) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “A beneficiary” and
202 inserting the phrase “A beneficiary on a government-assisted project subject to subcontracting
203 requirements under subsections (a), (b), or (b-1) of this section” in its place.
204 (B) A new paragraph (1A) is added to read as follows:
205 “(1A) The initial quarterly report filed by the beneficiary shall include a copy of
206 the subcontracting plan.”
207 (C) New paragraphs (3) and (4) are added to read as follows:
208 “(3) A subcontractor identified on a beneficiary’s subcontracting plan shall not
209 commence performance on the subcontract until the subcontract has been executed. The
210 beneficiary shall not receive credit for monies paid to a certified business enterprise
211 subcontractor for work performed on the government-assisted project before the subcontract
212 agreement was executed.
213 “(4) If a beneficiary fails to submit copies of the executed subcontracts within 30
214 calendar days of execution to the Department, the beneficiary’s failure shall render voidable by
215 the District any underlying contract with the beneficiary for that project.”.
216 (j) Section 2349a(a) (D.C. Official Code § 2-218.49a(a)) is amended as follows:
217 (1) A new paragraph (1A) is added to read as follows:
218 “(1A) An investment of a small investor, disadvantaged investor, or certified
219 equity participant shall not count toward the 20% equity requirement set forth in paragraph (1) of
9

220 this subsection if the beneficiary for the project and either the small investor, disadvantaged
221 investor, or certified equity participant stand in any of the following relationships with one
222 another:
223 “(A) One stands in an employee-employer relationship to the other;
224 “(B) One has an ownership or financial interest in the other; or
225 “(C) One has a fiduciary duty to the other.”.
226 (2) New paragraphs (4), (5), and (6) are added to read as follows:
227 “(4) An equity sponsor for a government-assisted project shall not be required to
228 pay developer fees, acquisition fees, or general contractor fees that, when totaled, are
229 unreasonably disproportionate to the percentage of its equity investment in the project.
230 “(5) An equity sponsor for a government-assisted project shall have voting rights
231 pertaining to personnel and managerial decisions on a covered project that are commensurate
232 with its percentage of equity investment.
233 “(6) The Mayor shall issue rules, pursuant to section 2372, specifying:
234 “(A) The maximum ratio between the percentage of total fees an equity
235 sponsor is required to pay and the percentage of its equity investment, before those fees become
236 unreasonably disproportionate for purposes of paragraph (4) of this subsection; and
237 “(B) The minimum ratio, between an equity sponsor’s percentage of total
238 voting rights and the percentage of its equity investment in the project, that makes the sponsor’s
239 voting rights commensurate with its percentage of equity investment for purposes of paragraph
240 (5) of this subsection.”.
241 (k) Section 2354(a), (b), and (c)(2) (D.C. Official Code § 2-218.54(a), (b), and (c)(2)) are
242 repealed.
10

243 (l) Section 2361 (D.C. Official Code § 2-218.61) is amended as follows:
244 (1) A new subsection (c-1) is added to read as follows:
245 “(c-1) If the Department denies an application for certification, the Department shall not
246 accept, review, or evaluate any of the following for a period of 6 months from the date the
247 applicant receives notice of the decision to deny the application:
248 “(1) Amendments to the denied application; or
249 “(2) A new certification application from the applicant, its agent(s),
250 representative(s), or other members of the public on the applicant's behalf.”.
251 (2) A new subsection (f) is added to read as follows:
252 “(f)(1) Within 90 days after the effective date of the 2024 Act, a business enterprise
253 certified by the Department as of the day before the 2024 Act’s effective date shall notify the
254 Department in writing if it determines that it no longer qualifies for certification under any of the
255 designations under sections 2331 through 2339a of the Act.
256 “(2) An application required by this subsection shall contain the information
257 required by subsection (b) of this section; provided, that the Department may by rule clarify the
258 documents or information required to be submitted with the application.
259 “(3) The Department shall deny the application of a certified business enterprise
260 filed pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection if:
261 “(A) The business enterprise timely filed the application and the
262 Department determines that the business no longer meets the requirements for certification under
263 this act; or
264 “(B) The business enterprise did not timely file the application.
11

265 “(4) A businessenterprise whose application is denied under paragraph (3) of this
266 subsection shall nonetheless be treated as a certified business enterprise for the purpose of the
267 following contracts, including with respect to the contracting, subcontracting, and procurement
268 requirements of this act, as well as any applicable subcontractor credit described in this act, so
269 long as the business enterprise remains in compliance with the other provisions of this act:
270 “(A) Any contract between the business enterprise and the District that
271 fwas executed before the effective date of 2024Act; and
272 “(B) Any contract executed before the effective date of the 2024 Act on
273 which the business enterprise was included as a subcontractor on a subcontracting plan.”
274 “(5) For the purpose of this section, the phrase “2024 Act” refers to the
275 Supporting Local Business Enterprises Amendment Act of 2024, introduced on ____ (Bill 25-
276 __).”.
277 (m) A new section 2361a is added to read as follows:
278 “Sec. 2361a. Certificate of registration during a public health emergency.
279 “(a) During a public health emergency declared by the Mayor pursuant to section 5a of
280 the District of Columbia Public Emergency Act of 1980, effective October 17, 2002 (D.C. Law
281 14-194; D.C. Official Code § 7-2304.01):
282 “(1) A business enterprise that satisfies all elements of section 2331 other than
283 section 2331(2) shall still be eligible for certification or subsequent certification as provided in
284 section 2361 if:
285 “(A) The business enterprise demonstrates that its chief executive officer
286 and highest-level managerial employees are restricted, by statute, regulation, Mayor’s Order, or
12

287 decision of the business, from working in the business enterprise’s principal office due to the
288 declared public health emergency; and
289 “(B) The principal office maintained by the business enterprise in the
290 District is either:
291 “(i) A brick-and-mortar dedicated office space leased or owned by
292 the business enterprise; or
293 “(ii) A leased or owned dwelling in which the majority owner of
294 the business enterprise resides.
295 “(2) A business enterprise certified pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection
296 shall be eligible for subsequent certification pursuant to section 2361(c-1) during the public
297 health emergency if it either:
298 “(A) Files a no-change affidavit, pursuant to section 2361(c-1), attesting
299 that there has been no material change in the business enterprise’s business status and that the
300 business enterprise continues to satisfy the requirements of paragraph (1) of this subsection; or
301 “(B) Demonstrates that the business enterprise satisfies section 2331.
302 “(b) A business enterprise certified pursuant to paragraph (a)(1) of this section shall be
303 eligible for subsequent certification after the public health emergency has ended so long as the
304 business enterprise demonstrates that it satisfies section 2331.
305 “(c) Notwithstanding section 2361(d), a certificate of registration issued during a public
306 health emergency to a business enterprise shall expire 1 year after the date of approval of the
307 application if the business enterprise did not demonstrate its compliance with section 2331(2).”.
308 (n) Section 2363 (D.C. Official Code § 2-218.63) is amended as follows:
309 (1) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
13

310 (A) Paragraph (3) is amended as follows:
311 (i) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the word “city” and
312 inserting the phrase “District government” in its place.
313 (ii) Subparagraph (C) is amended as follows:
314 (I) Sub-subparagraph (iii) is amended by striking the word
315 “Made” and inserting the phrase “Willfully made” in its place.
316 (II) Sub-subparagraph (iv) is amended to read as follows:
317 “(iv) Used a document that the person knows to contain a false
318 statement or entry; or”.
319 (III) A new sub-subparagraph (v) is added to read as
320 follows:
321 “(v) Willfully omitted a material fact in a submission to the
322 Department.”.
323 (iii) Subparagraph (H) is amended to read as follows:
324 “(H) Failed to operate and manage a certified joint venture in
325 accordance with section 2339; provided, that, if the joint venture demonstrates that the failure to
326 operate and manage the joint venture in accordance with the joint venture application was
327 necessary due to unforeseen business or operational issues, the failure shall not be a violation of
328 this act.”.
329 (ii) Subparagraph (I) is amended as follows:
330 (I) Strike the word “submits” and insert the word
331 “submitted” in its place.
14

332 (II) Strike the word “violates” and insert the word
333 “violated” in its place.
334 (iii) Subparagraph (J) is amended by striking the period at the end
335 and inserting the phrase “; or” in its place.
336 (B) A new paragraph (4) is added to read as follows:
337 “(4) A business enterprise:
338 “(A) Willfully obstructed or impeded, or attempted to obstruct or impede,
339 a District government official or employee investigating the qualifications of a business
340 enterprise that has requested certification; or
341 “(B) In any certified business enterprise matter administered under this
342 act:
343 “(i) Fraudulently obtained, attempted to obtain, or aided another
344 person in fraudulently obtaining or attempting to obtain, public moneys to which the person is
345 not entitled;
346 “(ii) Willfully falsified, concealed, or covered up a material fact by
347 any scheme or device;
348 “(iii) Willfully made a materially false statement or representation;
349 “(iv) Knowingly used a document that contains a false statement or
350 entry; or
351 “(v) Willfully omitted a material fact in a submission to the
352 Department.”.
353 (2) Subsection (b) is amended by striking the phrase “an individual or business”
354 and inserting the phrase “a person” in its place.
15

355 (3) Subsection (c) is amended as follows:
356 (A) The lead-in language is amended to read as follows:
357 “(c) If the Department determines, in accordance with procedures set forth in subsection
358 (g) of this section, that a person:”.
359 (B) Paragraph (1) is amended as follows:
360 (i) Strike the phrase “Department shall:” and insert the phrase
361 “Department shall, to the extent consistent with applicable law:” in its place.
362 (ii) Subparagraph (C) is amended as follows:
363 (I) Sub-subparagraph (i) is amended to read as follows:
364 “(i) Assess a civil penalty of not more than $25,000 for the third
365 and any subsequent offense.”.
366 (II) Sub-subparagraph (ii) is repealed.
367 (iii) Subparagraph (C-1) is amended by striking the phrase
368 “Department shall assess” and insert the phrase “Department shall, to the extent consistent with
369 applicable law, assess” in its place.
370 (C) Paragraph (2) is amended to read as follows:
371 “(2) Has committed a violation of subsection (a)(2) or (a)(3) of this section and is
372 a certified business enterprise or certified joint venture, the Department shall suspend or revoke
373 its certification;”.
374 (D) Paragraph (3) is repealed.
375 (E) Paragraph (4) is amended as follows:
376 (i) Strike the word “reasonably” and insert the word “reasonable”
377 in its place.
16

378 (ii) Strike the phrase “10% of the dollar volume of the contract that
379 the beneficiary or certified joint venture was required but failed to subcontract.” and insert the
380 phrase “the difference between the dollar volume the beneficiary or certified joint venture was
381 required to subcontract to certified business enterprises under section 2346 and the actual dollar
382 volume subcontracted to certified business enterprises.” in its place.
383 (iii) Strike the phrase “; and” and insert a semicolon in its place.
384 (F) Paragraph (5) is amended as follows:
385 (i) Strike the phrase “Department shall assess” and insert the
386 phrase “Department shall, to the extent consistent with applicable law, assess”
387 (i) Strike the period at the end and insert the phrase “; and” in its
388 place.
389 (G) A new paragraph (6) is added to read as follows:
390 “(6) Ceases to meet the requirements of a particular category of certification and
391 is a certified business enterprise, the Department may change the business enterprise’s certificate
392 of registration by removing the category of certification for which the business enterprise no
393 longer meets the requirements of certification; provided, that this paragraph shall not apply if a
394 certified business enterprise ceases to qualify as a local business enterprise.”.
395 (4) New subsections (d-1) and (d-2) are added to read as follows:
396 “(d-1) The Department may refer matters to the Office of Contracting and Procurement,
397 including matters involving agencies not subject to the Office of Contracting and Procurement’s
398 authority pursuant to section 201(b) of the Procurement Practices Reform Act of 2010, effective
399 April 8, 2011 (D.C. Law 18-371; D.C. Official Code § 2-352.01(b)), for investigation. If the
400 Office of Contracting and Procurement through its hearing procedures determines that a
17

401 beneficiary, business enterprise, or certified joint venture has committed more than 2 violations
402 of subsection (a)(1) of this section, or any violations of subsections (a)(3) or (a)(4) of this
403 section, the beneficiary, business enterprise, or certified joint venture shall be:
404 “(1) Debarred from consideration of award of contracts or subcontracts with the
405 District government for a period of no more than 5 years; and
406 “(2) Deemed ineligible from consideration for government-assisted projects with
407 the District government for a period of no more than 5 years.
408 “(d-2) The Department may refer any suspected violation of this section to the Attorney
409 General for the District of Columbia, who may bring a civil action in the Superior Court of the
410 District of Columbia against any person, including the directors or officers of a business
411 enterprise, alleged to have committed the violation. A person alleged to have violated subsection
412 (a)(3) or (a)(4) of this section shall be subject to civil penalties of $100,000, or triple the profit
413 earned by the person on all contracts awarded, whichever is greater.”.
414 (5) Subsection (e) is amended as follows:
415 (A) Paragraphs (1) through (3) are amended to read as follows:
416 “(1) Any person may file with the Department a formal or informal complaint
417 alleging a violation of this act. The Department shall maintain a hotline for the filing of informal
418 complaints.
419 “(2) The Department shall investigate each formal or informal complaint filed
420 with it, except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection.
421 “(3) The Department may dismiss a complaint without conducting an
18

422 investigation if the Department determines that the complaint is frivolous or otherwise without
423 merit. If the Department dismisses a formal complaint as frivolous or otherwise without merit,
424 the Department shall prepare a report documenting the following:
425 “(A) A statement detailing the formal complaint, including the name,
426 address, and telephone number of the person filing the complaint;
427 “(B) The name of the person or certified joint venture alleged to be in
428 violation of this act;
429 “(C) The facts and law considered in rendering the determination; and
430 “(D) Any other information considered in rendering the determination.”.
431 (B) Paragraph (4) is repealed.
432 (C) New paragraphs (5) and (6) are added to read as follows:
433 “(5) After the completion of an investigation conducted pursuant to this
434 subsection, the Department shall, as it deems appropriate, take any enforcement action available
435 under this act..
436 “(6) The Department shall maintain a record listing all formal complaints, which
437 shall contain the following information:
438 “(A) The name of the person alleged to be in violation of this act;
439 “(B) The date the formal complaint was made to the Department; and
440 “(C) A description of the formal complaint.”.
441 (6) Subsection (f) is repealed.
442 (7) Subsection (g) is amended to read as follows:
443 “(g)(1) Except as provided in paragraph (8) of this subsection, before issuing a civil
444 penalty to, or denying, suspending, changing, or revoking a certification of a business enterprise
19

445 or a certified joint venture, the Department shall issue a notice of determination to the person or
446 certified joint venture. The notice of determination shall describe the basis for the Department’s
447 determination; the proposed penalty, if any; and the process and timeline by which the person or
448 certified joint venture may request a hearing.
449 “(2) The person, or the certified representative if the notice of determination is
450 issued to a joint venture, may request a hearing before the Office of Administrative Hearings,
451 pursuant to paragraph (3) of this subsection, within 10 calendar days after receiving the notice. If
452 the person or certified joint venture does not request a hearing within that time, the civil penalty,
453 denial, suspension, change, or revocation shall become final.
454 “(3) If a hearing is requested, the Office of Administrative Hearings shall consider
455 the matter pursuant to section 19 of the Office of Administrative Hearings Establishment Act
456 of 2001, effective March 6, 2002 (D.C. Law 14-76; D.C. Official Code § 2-1831.16), and the
457 rules promulgated thereunder. The Department shall bear the burden of establishing the reason
458 for the civil penalty, change, denial, suspension, or revocation by a preponderance of the
459 evidence.
460 “(4) The decision of the Office of Administrative Hearings shall be the final
461 administrative decision for purpose of judicial review.
462 “(5) Notice of a final suspension or revocation of a certification shall be published
463 on the Department’s website.
464 “(6) A business enterprise or joint venture whose certification has been revoked
465 shall not be eligible to apply for a new certification from the Department until 36 months after
466 the date that the revocation became final.
467 “(7)(A) The Department may at any time, upon motion by a business enterprise or
20

468 joint venture whose certification has been suspended or revoked, remove the suspension or
469 reissue a certification, if the Department determines that it is in the District government's interest
470 to remove the suspension or reissue the certification before the end of the 36-month period and
471 such removal or reissuance does not endanger the health, safety, or welfare of the general public.
472 “(B) In determining whether to remove a suspension or reissuance a
473 certification, the Department shall consider in part whether the business enterprise or joint
474 venture submitted satisfactory proof that conditions within, or actions by, the business enterprise
475 or joint venture that led to the suspension or revocation have been corrected.
476 “(C) A business enterprise or joint venture whose certification is reissued
477 shall cease to be subject to the 36-month waiting period established in paragraph (6) of this
478 subsection.
479 “(8)(A) If, after an investigation, the Department determines that a business
480 enterprise or joint venture certified under this act has violated any provision of this act in such a
481 manner as to present an imminent danger to the health, safety, or welfare of any person or the
482 general public, and that a summary suspension is necessary and appropriate to respond to that
483 imminent danger, the Department may summarily suspend the certification of the business
484 enterprise or joint venture upon issuing the notice of determination described in paragraph (1) of
485 this subsection.
486 “(B) The notice of determination shall inform the business enterprise or
487 joint venture of the reason for the summary suspension and the right to request a hearing before
488 the Office of Administrative Hearings pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection.
489 “(C) If a business enterprise or joint venture timely requests a hearing on a
490 summary suspension, the Office of Administrative Hearings shall conduct the hearing within 14
21

491 days after receiving the request, unless the Office of Administrative Hearings and the business
492 enterprise or joint venture agree to a longer period of time, and shall issue a decision within 14
493 days after the record for the hearing closes.”.
494 (o) Section 2367 (D.C. Official Code § 2-218.67) is repealed.
495 (p) Section 2371 (D.C. Official Code § 2-218.71) is repealed.
496 (q) Section 2375(c)(2) (D.C. Official Code § 2-218.75(c)(2)) is amended by striking the
497 phrase “pursuant to section 2363(c)” and inserting the phrase “pursuant to section 2363(d-2)” in
498 its place.
499 Sec. 3. Section 3 of the District of Columbia Government Quick Payment Act of 1984,
500 effective March 15, 1985 (D.C. Law 5-164; D.C. Official Code 2-221.02), is amended as
501 follows:
502 (a) Subsection (d) is amended by adding a new paragraph (1A) to read as follows:
503 “(1A) A clause requiring a beneficiary performing work on a government-assisted
504 project for which a certified business enterprise (“CBE”) is utilized to meet the subcontracting
505 requirements pursuant to section 2346 of the Small and Certified Business Enterprise
506 Development and Assistance Act of 2005, effective October 20, 2005 (D.C. Law 16-33; D.C.
507 Official Code § 2-218.46), to submit an invoice to the District agency every 30 calendar days for
508 work by the CBE subcontractor that, in the beneficiary’s judgment, the subcontractor has
509 satisfactorily performed and properly invoiced, with the first invoice due to the District no later
510 than 35 calendar days after the certified business enterprise submits its initial invoice to the
511 beneficiary, unless the beneficiary’s contract with the District requires a different payment
512 timeline or deliverable;”.
513 (b) A new subsection (g) is added to read as follows:
22

514 “(g) The Mayor may impose a fine, or another penalty authorized by this act, on a
515 contractor, including a beneficiary, for failure to comply with a provision of this section or a
516 contract clause required by this section. The processes for determining the amount of the fine
517 and imposing the fine shall be established by the Mayor by rule issued pursuant to Title I of the
518 District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204;
519 D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.).”.
520 Sec. 4. The Certified Business Enterprise Program Compliance and Enforcement Support
521 Temporary Amendment Act of 2025, effective August 16, 2025 (D.C. Law 26-25; 72 DCR
522 7536), is repealed.
523 Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
524 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
525 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
526 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
527 Sec. 6. Effective date.
528 The act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
529 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
530 90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
531 412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
532 D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
23

Government of the District of Columbia
Office of the Chief Financial Officer
Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
MEMORANDUM
TO: The Honorable Phil Mendelson
Chairman, Council of the District of Columbia
FROM: Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
DATE: February 17, 2026
SUBJECT: Fiscal Impact Statement – Supporting Local Business Enterprises
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026
REFERENCE: Draft Bill as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on February 12,
2026
Conclusion
Funds are sufficient in the fiscal year 2026 through fiscal year 2029 budget and financial plan to
implement the bill.
Background
The Department of Small and Local Business Development (DSLBD) supports the growth and
development of the District’s small businesses through education, grants, certification programs, and
enforcement of contracting laws related to small business participation. DSLBD also runs the
Certified Business Enterprise (CBE) program. District-based businesses that meet specified criteria
regarding ownership, size, and physical location can qualify as CBEs. Organizations certified as CBEs
receive preference in District contracting or procurement actions.
The bill makes several changes to DSLBD’s business enterprise certification programs and CBE
program and would permanently modify the process to appeal a CBE determination or file a
complaint. These changes are currently in effect on a temporary basis.1 The bill repeals the existing
1 These provisions are in effect on a temporary basis until March 29, 2026, via the Certified Business
Enterprise Program Compliance and Enforcement Support Temporary Amendment Act of 2025, effective
August 16, 2025 (D.C. Law 26-25; 72 DCR 7536).
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Suite 203, Washington, DC 20004 (202)727-2476
www.cfo.dc.gov

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “Supporting Local Business Enterprises Emergency Amendment Act of 2026,” Draft Bill as provided to
the Office of Revenue Analysis on February 12, 2026
temporary legislation in favor of this emergency bill and its accompanying temporary and permanent
versions.
Within the CBE category, DSLBD also certifies businesses in several categories that qualify the
business for additional priority in contracting actions (via point scoring or percentage reduction in
price)2, including Small Business Enterprises, Local Business Enterprises, Disadvantaged Business
Enterprises, and Equity Impact Enterprises. The bill changes the definition for many of these
additional subcategories and outlines how existing CBEs will be treated if they no longer meet the
criteria for CBEs set out in the bill.
The bill expands the CBE designation (that applies to prime contractors or developers on
government-assisted contracts) to include not-for-profit entities. Under current law, only for-profit
entities qualify as CBEs. The bill also establishes the process for waiving certain CBE criteria during
a public health emergency if its high-level employees (that would otherwise be required to be in their
offices in the District) are restricted from working in the office.
In disposing of excess real property owned by the District, the Mayor may require that the developer
contract with certified local business for equity investment in the project (an “equity sponsor”). The
bill further defines equity sponsor for these purposes to include a small investor, disadvantaged
investor, or certified equity participant. The bill prohibits the developer from charging fees to the
equity sponsor that are unreasonably large relative to the equity investment, and it requires the
Mayor to issue rules implementing this section.
Disadvantaged Business Enterprises must be local business enterprises that are more than 50
percent owned, operated, and controlled by socially and economically disadvantaged individuals.
The bill redefines Disadvantaged Business Enterprises to be those held by individuals whose
personal net worth is at or below the level qualifying for the federal Disadvantaged Business
Enterprise program.
The bill revises the definition of Small Business Enterprises to match the federal definition of “small
business concern” or have gross receipts below a certain level.
The bill revises the certification for Local Business Enterprises. Local Business Enterprises are those
that are independently owned and operated and either 1) more than 50 percent owned and
controlled by a District-based enterprise or not-for-profit business, or 2) owned by a non-district
business enterprise that itself is more than 50 percent owned by District residents.
The bill eliminates the Living Wage Certification Program (the “Program”) that was established to
certify businesses that pay their employees a living wage3. These businesses could then advertise
their designation as a living wage employer under the Program. The Program was never established
or funded. The bill also repeals a reporting requirement.
The bill changes the hearing procedures for persons wishing to protest a DSLBD determination or
penalty, removing a requirement that DSLBD hold an internal hearing before the applicant or entity
can appeal to the Office of Administrative Hearings, and increases the civil penalty amounts for
2 Slide 1 (dc.gov)
3 Living Wage Certification Grant Program Amendment Act of 2018, effective October 30, 2018 (D.C. Law 22-
168; D.C. Official Code § 2-218.15).
Page 2 of 3

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “Supporting Local Business Enterprises Emergency Amendment Act of 2026,” Draft Bill as provided to
the Office of Revenue Analysis on February 12, 2026
entities that are found to have violated certain of the contracting and subcontracting requirements
set out in the law. The bill also permits both formal and informal complaints and more explicitly lays
out DSLBD’s process after conducting an investigation of a formal complaint, including timeframes.
Finally, the bill eliminates the Volunteer Corps of Executives and Entrepreneurs, which was designed
to provide mentoring and network opportunities to Certified Business Enterprises. The Volunteer
Corps was never established.
Financial Plan Impact
Funds are sufficient in the fiscal year 2026 through fiscal year 2029 budget and financial plan to
implement the bill. Costs related to changing these definitions were absorbed during the
implementation of previous emergency and temporary legislation.4 Therefore, there is no additional
cost associated with this emergency bill or its accompanying temporary and permanent versions. As
the Living Wage Certification Program and the Volunteer Corps were never operational, their repeal
has no impact on the budget and financial plan.
4 The Local Business Enterprise Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2022, effective April 25, 2022
through July 24, 2022 (D.C. Act 24-382; 69 DCR 4037), the Local Business Enterprise Clarification Emergency
Amendment Act of 2023, effective February 27, 2023 through May 28, 2023 (D.C. Act 25-37; 70 DCR 2984)
and the Local Business Enterprise Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2023, effective May 25, 2023
through Jan 5, 2024 (D.C. Act A25-55; 70 DCR 8446).
Page 3 of 3

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
BRIAN L. SCHWALB
ATTORNEY GENERAL
LEGAL COUNSEL DIVISION
MEMORANDUM
TO: Tomás Talamante
Director
Office of Policy and Legislative Affairs
FROM: Adele El-Khouri
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
DATE: February 11, 2026
SUBJECT: Legal Sufficiency Review of Draft “Supporting Local Business Enterprises
Emergency Amendment Act of 2026,” “Supporting Local Business Enterprises
Temporary Amendment Act of 2026,” and Accompanying Emergency Declaration
Resolution
(AE-25-302 C)
_____________________________________________________________________________________
This is to Certify that
this Office has reviewed the above-referenced draft
legislation and found it to be legally sufficient. If you have any questions in this regard, please do
not hesitate to call me at (202) 262-6402.
_________________________________
Adele El-Khouri
2